Hawaii statutes.
§145-14 Disposition of fees and charges.
All fees, charges, expenses, and other moneys collected pursuant to this
chapter shall be deposited with the state director of finance to the credit of
the general fund. [L 1951, c 74, pt of §1; RL 1955, §23-14; am L 1963, c 114,
§1 and c 193, §13; HRS §145-14]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next